src/fst/orthography/spellrelax.regex
# Tundra Nenets

# Glottal stop spellrelax
# These need to be changed 2016-05-26
[Ң (->) Н г, # 04A2 not two letters
 ң (->) н г, # 04A3 not two letters
 Ң (->) Ҥ, # U+04A2 not 04A4 
 ң (->) ҥ, # U+04A3 not 04A5
 Ң (->) Ӈ, # U+04A2 not 04C7 
 ң (->) ӈ, # U+04A3 not 04C8
# U+E404 CYRILLIC LETTER E WITH DOT ABOVE
# U+E405 CYRILLIC SMALL LETTER E WITH DOT ABOVE
# These are not reliably distinguished by writers, so just everything to everything.
 ˮ (->) %"  , # 02EE not quot " U+0022 
 ˮ (->) %'%', # 02EE not two apostr U+0027 U+0027 
 ˮ (->) %”  , # 02EE not (high nine) RIGHT DOUBLE QUOTATION MARK U+201D
 ˮ (->) %’%’, # 02EE not (high nine) two RIGHT SINGLE QUOTATION MARKS U+2019
 ˮ (->) %’  , # 02EE not (high-9) RIGHT SINGLE QUOTATION MARK U+2019 1937-1960
 ʼ (->) %"  , # 02EE not quot " U+0022 
 ʼ (->) %'%', # 02EE not two apostr U+0027 U+0027 
 ʼ (->) %”  , # 02EE not (high nine) RIGHT DOUBLE QUOTATION MARK U+201D
 ʼ (->) %’%’, # 02EE not (high nine) two RIGHT SINGLE QUOTATION MARKS U+2019
 ʼ (->) %’  , # 02EE not (high-9) RIGHT SINGLE QUOTATION MARK U+2019 1937-1960
 ˮ (->) %'  , # 02bc not apostr u+0027 (should the apostrophe be commented out?)
 ˮ (->) ‘   , # 02bc not high-6 u+2018
 ˮ (->) ″   , # 02bc not high-6 u+2033 Double prime
 ˮ (->) ᾽᾽   , # 02bc not high-6 u+1FBD two x Greek Koronis
 ˮ (->) %’  , # 02bc not (high-9) right single quotation mark u+2019
 ˮ (->) %´  , # 02bc not acute u+00b4
 ˮ (->) %`  , #  02bc not grave u+0060
 ʼ (->) %'  , # 02bc not apostr u+0027 (should the apostrophe be commented out?)
 ʼ (->) ‘   , # 02bc not high-6 u+2018
 ʼ (->) ᾽   , # 02bc not high-6 u+1FBD Greek Koronis
 ʼ (->) %’  , # 02bc not (high-9) right single quotation mark u+2019
 ʼ (->) %´  , # 02bc not acute u+00b4
 ʼ (->) %`  ] #  02bc not grave u+0060
.o.

# Eastern dialect differences
[т и (->) ч и ,
 т у (->) ч у ,
 т а (->) ч а ,
 т ь (->) ч ь ,
 т е (->) ч е || .#. _ ]

.o.

[ц и   (->) ч и ,
 ц ь у (->) ч у ,
 ц ь а (->) ч а ,
 ц ь   (->) ч ь ,
 ц е   (->) ч е || .#. ?+ _ ]
;

# Explanation:
# lexical side (->) input 
# or:
# correct (->) out there
